Washington statutes.
RCW 18.165.230

Enforcement of orders for payment of fines.

If an order for payment of a fine is made as a result of a hearing and timely payment is not made as directed in the final order, the director may enforce the order for payment in the superior court in the county in which the hearing was held. This right of enforcement shall be in addition to any other rights the director may have as to a licensee ordered to pay a fine but shall not be construed to limit a licensee's ability to seek judicial review.

In an action for enforcement of an order of payment of a fine, the director's order is conclusive proof of the validity of the order of payment of a fine and the terms of payment.

[ 1991 c 328 s 23.]